Washington statutes.
RCW 25.12.005

Application of chapter.

The provisions of this chapter shall apply only to those limited partnerships which were in existence on or prior to June 6, 1945 and which have not become a limited partnership under *chapter 25.08 RCW.

[ 1955 c 15 s 25.12.005.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Chapter 25.08 RCW was repealed in its entirety by 1981 c 51 s 72; later enactment, see chapter 25.10 RCW.